Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 1. Livestock Biologics and Drug Law.

§ 69-17-1.
Citation of article.

This article shall be known and may be cited and referred to as the “Livestock Biologics and Drug Law of 1958.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4862-01; Laws, 1958, ch. 152, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1958).

§ 69-17-3.
Sale of biologics, drugs, etc., prohibited until approved by Board of Animal Health.

No person, firm or corporation shall sell or offer for sale any biologics, drugs, remedies, tonics, medicine or other health preparation in the State of Mississippi designed for or to be administered to any livestock, poultry or any other animals until same has been registered with and approved for distribution by the board of animal health as herein provided for. Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the sale of any antibiotics by any concern to farmers or livestock owners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4862-02; Laws, 1958, ch. 152, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1958).

§ 69-17-5.
Article not applicable where preparations are dispensed by a licensed veterinarian.

Nothing in this article shall apply to the dispensing of biologics, drugs, remedies, tonics, medicines or preparations hereinabove referred to by a licensed veterinarian if same is delivered by the licensed practitioner in the course of his professional practice or upon his prescription.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4862-06; Laws, 1958, ch. 152, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1958).

§ 69-17-7.
Other exemptions.

Any biologics, drugs, remedies, tonics, medicine or other preparation hereinabove referred to which are licensed or which are authorized to be sold under and in accordance with the Public Health Service Act of July 1, 1944 (58 Stat. 682; 42 U.S.C. Supp. V. 201 et seq.) or under the animal virus-serum-toxin law of March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 832; 21 U.S.C. 151 et seq.) shall be exempt from the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4862-07; Laws, 1958, ch. 152, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1958).

§ 69-17-9.
Application for registration.

The application for registration shall be made in such form and contain such information as may be prescribed by the Board of Animal Health of the State of Mississippi and shall give in detail the composition of the preparation, the safety of its use, recommendations and directions for use, claims of effectiveness and proof of all claims, and shall include an official product label and any other evidence which the said board considers necessary in determining eligibility of registration in compliance with this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4862-03; Laws, 1958, ch. 152, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1958).

§ 69-17-11.
Rules and regulations.

The said Board of Animal Health is hereby authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent with this article, which may be necessary to its effective administration.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4862-04; Laws, 1958, ch. 152, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1958).

§ 69-17-13.
Investigation and seizure of products.

The said Board of Animal Health and its authorized representatives shall have the right to inspect, investigate, sample and seize in accordance with lawful procedure any product covered by this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4862-05; Laws, 1958, ch. 152, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1958).

§ 69-17-15.
Penalties.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any provision, or provisions, of this article shall have his registration rejected or revoked, and shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, in addition to the foregoing, may be fined not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or imprisoned in jail not exceeding thirty days, either or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4862-08; Laws, 1958, ch. 152, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1958).